Utah statutes.
20A-1-606.   Wagering on elections forbidden.
(1) (a)  A candidate may not, before or during any primary or election
campaign:
(i)  make any bet or wager anything of pecuniary value on the result of the
primary or election, or on any event or contingency relating to any pending
primary or election;
(ii)  become a party to any bet or wager on the result of a primary or
election or on any event or contingency relating to any pending primary or
election; and
(iii)  provide money or any other valuable thing to be used by any other
person in betting or wagering upon the results of any impending primary or
election.
(b)  In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, a person
who commits an offense under Subsection (1) is guilty of a third degree
felony.
(2) (a)  A person who is not a candidate may not make any bet or wager
anything of pecuniary value on the result of any primary or election, or on
any event or contingency relating to any primary or election.
(b)  In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, a person
who commits an offense under Subsection (2)(a) is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
(3) (a)  A person may not directly or indirectly make a bet or wager with any
voter that is dependent upon the outcome of any primary or election with the
intent to subject that voter to the possibility of challenge at a primary or
election or to prevent the voter from voting at a primary or election.
(b)  In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, a person
who commits an offense under Subsection (3)(a) is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
